New Jersey, session 221, S498.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    There is established the Jersey Shore Safety and Economy Task Force.  The purpose of the task force is to develop safety standards and protocols to ensure safe working and operating conditions, in a manner that is consistent with the States public health efforts to slow the spread of coronavirus disease 2019, in businesses that rely heavily on the summer tourism industry in the following counties: Atlantic County, Cape May County, Ocean County, and Monmouth County.  The task force shall consider available data and information in order to develop and issue a report that: a.     provides guidance, including any applicable social distancing guidelines, for the reopening of these businesses in a manner that promotes the safety and wellbeing of the employees and patrons of these businesses; b.    provides an assessment of the economic impact of the task forces recommendations on these businesses; and c.     provides an assessment of the impact of the task forces recommendations on the spread of coronavirus disease 2019 in the State. 2.    a.  The task force shall consist of 14 members as follows: (1)   the Commissioner of Health, or the commissioners designee, who shall serve ex officio; (2)   the Director of the Division of Travel and Tourism in the Department of State, or the directors designee, who shall serve ex officio; (3)   two members of the Senate, to be appointed by the President of the Senate, who shall each be of different political parties; (4)   two members of the General Assembly, to be appointed by the Speaker of the General Assembly, who shall each be of different political parties; and (5)   eight public members to be appointed by the Governor as follows: one member upon the recommendation of the Atlantic County Division of Public Health; one member upon the recommendation of the Cape May County Health Department; one member upon the recommendation of the Ocean County Health Department; one member upon the recommendation of the Monmouth County Health Department; and four members upon the recommendation of the New Jersey Chamber of Commerce, including one member who is an active participant in tourism-related business in Atlantic County, one member who is an active participant in tourism-related business in Cape May County, one member who is an active participant in tourism-related business in Ocean County, and one member who is an active participant in tourism-related business in Monmouth County. b.    The Commissioner of Health, or the commissioners designee, shall serve as chairperson of the task force.  The task force shall organize as soon as practicable following the appointment of its members and shall select a vice-chairperson from among the members.  The chairperson shall appoint a secretary who need not be a member of the task force. c.     The members shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties and within the limits of funds available to the task force. d.    The task force shall be entitled to call to its assistance and avail itself of the services of the employees of any State, county or municipal department, board, bureau, commission, or agency as it may require and as may be available to it for its purposes. e.     The task force may meet and hold hearings at the places it designates during the sessions or recesses of the Legislature. f.     The Department of Health shall provide staff support to the task force. g.    Vacancies in the membership of the task force shall be filled in the same manner provided for the original appointments. 3.    The task force shall report its recommendations to the Atlantic County Division of Public Health, the Cape May County Health Department, the Ocean County Health Department, the Monmouth County Health Department, the New Jersey Chamber of Commerce, the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) no later than 30 days after the adoption of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) 4.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire upon the issuance of the task force report.